Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4570.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.28, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Size limitations. (a) A cannabis microbusiness that cultivates cannabis at an indoor facility may cultivate up to 5,000 square feet of plant canopy. The office may adjust plant canopy limits for licensed businesses upward to meet market demand consistent with the goals identified in section 342.02, subdivision 1. In each licensing period, the office may adjust plant canopy limits upward or downward for licenses that will be issued in that period to meet market demand consistent with the goals identified in section 342.02, subdivision 1, except that the office must not impose a limit of less than 5,000 square feet of plant canopy. (b) A cannabis microbusiness that cultivates cannabis at an outdoor location may cultivate up to deleted text begin one-halfdeleted text end new text begin onenew text end acre of mature, flowering plants. The office may increase the limit for licensed businesses to meet market demand consistent with the goals identified in section 342.02, subdivision 1. In each licensing period, the office may adjust the limit upward or downward for licenses that will be issued in that period to meet market demand consistent with the goals identified in section 342.02, subdivision 1, except that the office must not impose a limit of less than deleted text begin one-halfdeleted text end new text begin onenew text end acre of mature, flowering plants. (c) The office shall establish a limit on the manufacturing of cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products a cannabis microbusiness that manufactures such products may perform. The limit must be equivalent to the amount of cannabis flower that can be harvested from a facility with a plant canopy of 5,000 square feet in a year, but may be increased if the office expands the allowable area of cultivation under paragraph (a). (d) A cannabis microbusiness with the appropriate endorsement may operate one retail location.